Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 14.8 Uniform Debt-Management Services Act
19-14.8-19.
Form and content of agreement.

An agreement must:

Be in a record;

Be dated and signed by the provider and the individual;

Include the name of the individual and the address where the individual resides;

Include the name, business address, and telephone number of the provider;

Be delivered to the individual immediately upon formation of the agreement; and

Disclose:

The services to be provided;

The amount, or method of determining the amount, of all fees, individually itemized, to be paid by the individual;

The schedule of payments to be made by, or on behalf of, the individual, including the amount of each payment, the date on which each payment is due, and an estimate of the date of the final payment or, if such information is not known to the provider at the time the agreement is made, and affirmative statement to that effect;

If a plan provides for regular periodic payments to creditors:

Each creditor of the individual to which payment will be made, the amount owed to each creditor, and any concessions the provider reasonably believes each creditor will offer or, if the provider cannot form a reasonable belief as to such amounts and concessions at the time the agreement is made, an affirmative statement to that effect; and

The schedule of expected payments to each creditor, including the amount of each payment and the date on which it will be made;

Each creditor that the provider believes will not participate in the plan and to which the provider will not direct payment;

How the provider will comply with its obligations under §

19-14.8-27(a)

;

That the provider may terminate the agreement for good cause, upon return of unexpended money of the individual;

That the individual may cancel the agreement as provided in §

19-14.8-20

;

That the individual may contact the director with any questions or complaints regarding the provider; and

The address, telephone number, and internet address or website of the director.

For purposes of subsection (a)(5), delivery of an electronic record occurs when it is made available in a format in which the individual may retrieve, save, and print it and the individual is notified that it is available.

If the director supplies the provider with any information required under subsection (a)(6)(J), the provider may comply with that requirement only by disclosing the information supplied by the director.

An agreement must provide that:

The individual has a right to terminate the agreement at any time, without penalty or obligation, by giving the provider written or electronic notice, in which event:

(A)

The provider will refund all unexpended money that the provider or its agent has received from or on behalf of the individual for the reduction or satisfaction of the individual’s debt;

(B)

With respect to an agreement that contemplates that creditors will settle debts for less than the principal amount of debt, the provider will refund sixty-five percent (65%) of any portion of the set-up fee that has not been credited against the settlement fee; and

(C)

All powers of attorney granted by the individual to the provider are revoked and ineffective;

(2)

The individual authorizes any bank in which the provider or its agent has established a trust account to disclose to the director any financial records relating to the trust account; and

(3)

The provider will notify the individual within five (5) days after learning of a creditor’s decision to reject or withdraw from a plan and that this notice will include:

(A)

The identity of the creditor; and

(B)

The right of the individual to modify or terminate the agreement.

An agreement may confer on a provider a power of attorney to settle the individual’s debt for no more than fifty percent (50%) of the principal amount of the debt. An agreement may not confer a power of attorney to settle a debt for more than fifty percent (50%) of that amount, but may confer a power of attorney to negotiate with creditors of the individual on behalf of the individual. An agreement must provide that the provider will obtain the assent of the individual after a creditor has assented to a settlement for more than fifty percent (50%) of the principal amount of the debt.

An agreement may not:

Provide for application of the law of any jurisdiction other than the United States and this state;

Except as permitted by Section 2 of the Federal Arbitration Act, 9 U.S.C. § 2, as amended, contain a provision that modifies or limits otherwise available forums or procedural rights, including the right to trial by jury, that are generally available to the individual under law other than this chapter;

Contain a provision that restricts the individual’s remedies under this chapter or law other than this chapter; or

Contain a provision that:

(A)

Limits or releases the liability of any person for not performing the agreement or for violating this chapter; or

(B)

Indemnifies any person for liability arising under the agreement or this chapter.

All rights and obligations specified in subsection (d) and §

19-14.8-20

exist even if not provided in the agreement. A provision in an agreement that violates subsection (d), (e), or (f) is void.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-20.
Cancellation of agreement — Waiver.

An individual may cancel an agreement before midnight of the third (3rd) business day after the individual assents to it, unless the agreement does not comply with subsection (b) or §

19-14.8-19

or §

19-14.8-28

, in which event the individual may cancel the agreement within thirty (30) days after the individual assents to it. To exercise the right to cancel, the individual must give notice in a record to the provider. Notice by mail is given when mailed.

An agreement must be accompanied by a form that contains in bold-face type, surrounded by bold black lines:

If a personal financial emergency necessitates the disbursement of an individual’s money to one or more of the individual’s creditors before the expiration of three (3) days after an agreement is signed, an individual may waive the right to cancel. To waive the right, the individual must send or deliver a signed, dated statement in the individual’s own words describing the circumstances that necessitate a waiver. The waiver must explicitly waive the right to cancel. A waiver by means of a standard-form record is void.

Notice of Right to Cancel You may cancel this agreement, without any penalty or obligation, at any time before midnight of the third business day that begins the day after you agree to it by electronic communication or by signing it. To cancel this agreement during this period, send an e-mail to or mail or deliver a signed, dated copy of E-mail address of provider this notice, or any other written notice to Name of provider at before midnight on . Address of provider Date If you cancel this agreement within the 3-day period, we will refund all money you already have paid us. You also may terminate this agreement at any later time, but we are not required to refund fees you have paid us. I cancel this agreement, Print your name Signature Date

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-21.
Required language.

Unless the director, by rule, provides otherwise, the disclosures and documents required by this chapter must be in English. If a provider communicates with an individual primarily in a language other than English, the provider must furnish a translation into the other language of the disclosures and documents required by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-22.
Trust account.

All money paid to a provider by, or on behalf of, an individual pursuant to a plan for distribution to creditors is held in trust. Within two (2) business days after receipt, the provider shall deposit the money in a trust account established for the benefit of individuals to whom the provider is furnishing debt-management services.

Money held in trust by a provider is not property of the provider or its designee. The money is not available to creditors of the provider or designee, except an individual from whom or on whose behalf the provider received money, to the extent that the money has not been disbursed to creditors of the individual.

A provider shall:

Maintain separate records of account for each individual to whom the provider is furnishing debt-management services;

Disburse money paid by, or on behalf of, the individual to creditors of the individual as disclosed in the agreement, except that:

The provider may delay payment to the extent that a payment by the individual is not final; and

If a plan provides for regular periodic payments to creditors, the disbursement must comply with the due dates established by each creditor; and

Promptly correct any payments that are not made or that are misdirected as a result of an error by the provider or other person in control of the trust account and reimburse the individual for any costs or fees imposed by a creditor as a result of the failure to pay or misdirection.

A provider may not commingle money in a trust account established for the benefit of individuals to whom the provider is furnishing debt-management services with money of other persons.

A trust account must at all times have a cash balance equal to the sum of the balances of each individual’s account.

If a provider has established a trust account pursuant to subsection (a), the provider shall reconcile the trust account at least once a month. The reconciliation must compare the cash balance in the trust account with the sum of the balances in each individual’s account. If the provider or its designee has more than one trust account, each trust account must be individually reconciled.

If a provider discovers, or has a reasonable suspicion of, embezzlement or other unlawful appropriation of money held in trust, the provider immediately shall notify the director by a method approved by the director. Unless the director by rule provides otherwise, within five (5) days thereafter, the provider shall give notice to the director describing the remedial action taken or to be taken.

If an individual terminates an agreement or it becomes reasonably apparent to a provider that a plan has failed, the provider shall promptly refund to the individual all money paid by, or on behalf of, the individual which has not been paid to creditors, less fees that are payable to the provider under §

19-14.8-23

.

Before relocating a trust account from one bank to another, a provider shall inform the director of the name, business address, and telephone number of the new bank. As soon as practicable, the provider shall inform the director of the account number of the trust account at the new bank.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-23.
Fees and other charges.

A provider may not impose directly, or indirectly, a fee or other charge on an individual or receive money from, or on behalf of, an individual for debt-management services except as permitted by this section.

A provider may not impose charges or receive payment for debt-management services until the provider and the individual have signed an agreement that complies with §§

19-14.8-19

and

19-14.8-28

.

If an individual assents to an agreement, a provider may not impose a fee or other charge for educational or counseling services, or the like, except as otherwise provided in this subsection and §

19-14.8-28(d)

. The director may authorize a provider to charge a fee based on the nature and extent of the educational or counseling services furnished by the provider.

Subject to adjustment of dollar amounts pursuant to §

19-14.8-32(f)

, the following rules apply:

If an individual assents to a plan that contemplates that creditors will reduce finance charges or fees for late payment, default, or delinquency, the provider may charge:

A fee not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for consultation, obtaining a credit report, setting up an account, and the like; and

A monthly service fee, not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) times the number of creditors remaining in a plan at the time the fee is assessed, but not more than fifty dollars ($50) in any month.

If an individual assents to a plan that contemplates that creditors will settle debts for less than the principal amount of the debt, a provider may charge:

Subject to §

19-14.8-19(d)

, a fee for consultation, obtaining a credit report, setting up an account, and the like, in an amount not exceeding the lesser of four hundred dollars ($400) and four percent (4%) of the debt in the plan at the inception of the plan; and

A monthly service fee, not to exceed ten dollars ($10) times the number of creditors remaining in a plan at the time the fee is assessed, but not more than fifty dollars ($50) in any month.

A provider may not impose or receive fees under both subsections (d)(1) and (d)(2) of this section.

Except as otherwise provided in §

19-14.8-28(d)

, if an individual does not assent to an agreement, a provider may receive for educational and counseling services it provides to the individual a fee not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) or, with the approval of the director, a larger fee. The director may approve a fee larger than one hundred ($100) if the nature and extent of the educational and counseling services warrant the larger fee.

If, before the expiration of ninety (90) days after the completion or termination of educational or counseling services, an individual assents to an agreement, the provider shall refund to the individual any fee paid pursuant to subsection (d)(4).

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d), if a plan contemplates that creditors will settle an individual’s debts for less than the principal amount of the debt, compensation for services in connection with settling a debt may not exceed, with respect to each debt:

Thirty percent (30%) of the excess of the principal amount of the debt over the amount paid the creditor pursuant to the plan less;

To the extent it has not been credited against an earlier settlement fee:

The fee charged pursuant to subsection (d)(2)(A); and

The aggregate of fees charged pursuant to subsection (d)(2)(B) of this section.

Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to §

19-14.8-32(f)

, if a payment to a provider by an individual under this chapter is dishonored, a provider may impose a reasonable charge on the individual, not to exceed the lesser of twenty-five dollars ($25) and the amount permitted by law other than this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-24.
Voluntary contributions.

A provider may not solicit a voluntary contribution from an individual or an affiliate of the individual for any service provided to the individual. A provider may accept voluntary contributions from an individual but, until thirty (30) days after completion or termination of a plan, the aggregate amount of money received from, or on behalf of, the individual may not exceed the total amount the provider may charge the individual under §

19-14.8-23

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-25.
Voidable agreements.

If a provider imposes a fee or other charge or receives money or other payments not authorized by §

19-14.8-23

or §

19-14.8-24

, the individual may void the agreement and recover as provided in §

19-14.8-35

.

If a provider is not registered as required by this chapter when an individual assents to an agreement, the agreement is voidable by the individual.

If an individual voids an agreement under subsection (b), the provider does not have a claim against the individual for breach of contract or for restitution.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-26.
Termination of agreements.

If an individual who has entered into an agreement fails for sixty (60) days to make payments required by the agreement, a provider may terminate the agreement.

If a provider or an individual terminates an agreement, the provider shall immediately return to the individual:

Any money of the individual held in trust for the benefit of the individual; and

Sixty-five percent (65%) of any portion of the set-up fee received pursuant to §

19-14.8-23(d)(2)

that has not been credited against settlement fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-27.
Periodic reports and retention of records.

A provider shall provide the accounting required by subsection (b):

Upon cancellation or termination of an agreement; and

Before cancellation or termination of any agreement:

At least once each month; and

Within five (5) business days after a request by an individual, but the provider need not comply with more than one request in any calendar month.

The amount of the debt when the creditor agreed to the settlement; and

The calculation of a settlement fee.

A provider, in a record, shall provide each individual for whom it has established a plan an accounting of the following information:

The amount of money received from the individual since the last report;

The amounts and dates of disbursement made on the individual’s behalf, or by the individual upon the direction of the provider, since the last report to each creditor listed in the plan;

The amounts deducted from the amount received from the individual;

The amount held in reserve; and

If, since the last report, a creditor has agreed to accept as payment in full an amount less than the principal amount of the debt owed by the individual:

(A)

The total amount and terms of the settlement;

(B)

The amount of the debt when the individual assented to the plan;

A provider shall maintain records for each individual for whom it provides debt-management services for five (5) years after the final payment made by the individual and produce a copy of them to the individual within a reasonable time after a request for them. The provider may use electronic or other means of storage of the records.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-28.
Prohibited acts and practices.

A provider may not, directly or indirectly:

Misappropriate or misapply money held in trust;

Settle a debt on behalf of an individual for more than fifty percent (50%) of the principal amount of the debt owed a creditor, unless the individual assents to the settlement after the creditor has assented;

Take a power of attorney that authorizes it to settle a debt, unless the power of attorney expressly limits the providers authority to settle debts for not more than fifty percent (50%) of the principal amount of the debt owed a creditor;

Exercise or attempt to exercise a power of attorney after an individual has terminated an agreement;

Initiate a transfer from an individual’s account at a bank or with another person unless the transfer is:

A return of money to the individual; or

Before termination of an agreement, properly authorized by the agreement and this chapter, and for:

Payment to one or more creditors pursuant to a plan; or

Payment of a fee;

Offer a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or other compensation to an individual for executing an agreement;

Offer, pay, or give a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or other compensation to a person for referring a prospective customer, if the person making the referral has a financial interest in the outcome of debt-management services provided to the customer, unless neither the provider nor the person making the referral communicates to the prospective customer the identity of the source of the referral;

Receive a bonus, commission, or other benefit for referring an individual to a person;

Structure a plan in a manner that would result in a negative amortization of any of an individual’s debts, unless a creditor that is owed a negatively amortizing debt agrees to refund or waive the finance charge upon payment of the principal amount of the debt;

Compensate its employees on the basis of a formula that incorporates the number of individuals the employee induces to enter into agreements;

Settle a debt or lead an individual to believe that a payment to a creditor is in settlement of a debt to the creditor unless, at the time of settlement, the individual receives a certification by the creditor that the payment is in full settlement of the debt;

Make a representation that:

The provider will furnish money to pay bills or prevent attachments;

Payment of a certain amount will permit satisfaction of a certain amount or range of indebtedness; or

Participation in a plan will or may prevent litigation, garnishment, attachment, repossession, foreclosure, eviction, or loss of employment;

Misrepresent that it is authorized or competent to furnish legal advice or perform legal services;

Represent that it is a not-for-profit entity unless it is organized and properly operating as a not-for-profit under the law of the state in which it was formed or that it is a tax-exempt entity unless it has received certification of tax-exempt status from the Internal Revenue Service;

Take a confession of judgment or power of attorney to confess judgment against an individual; or

Employ an unfair, unconscionable, or deceptive act or practice, including the knowing omission of any material information.

If a provider furnishes debt-management services to an individual, the provider may not, directly or indirectly:

Purchase a debt or obligation of the individual;

Receive from or on behalf of the individual:

A promissory note or other negotiable instrument other than a check or a demand draft; or

A post-dated check or demand draft;

Lend money or provide credit to the individual, except as a deferral of a settlement fee at no additional expense to the individual;

Obtain a mortgage or other security interest from any person in connection with the services provided to the individual;

Except as permitted by federal law, disclose the identity or identifying information of the individual or the identity of the individual’s creditors, except to:

The director, upon proper demand;

A creditor of the individual, to the extent necessary to secure the cooperation of the creditor in a plan; or

The extent necessary to administer the plan;

Except as otherwise provided in §

19-14.8-23(f)

, provide the individual less than the full benefit of a compromise of a debt arranged by the provider;

Charge the individual for or provide credit or other insurance, coupons for goods or services, membership in a club, access to computers or the Internet, or any other matter not directly related to debt-management services or educational services concerning personal finance; or

Furnish legal advice or perform legal services, unless the person furnishing that advice to or performing those services for the individual is licensed to practice law.

This chapter does not authorize any person to engage in the practice of law.

A provider may not receive a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or other compensation, directly or indirectly, for advising, arranging, or assisting an individual in connection with obtaining, an extension of credit or other service from a lender or service provider, except for educational or counseling services required in connection with a government-sponsored program.

Unless a person supplies goods, services, or facilities generally and supplies them to the provider at a cost no greater than the cost the person generally charges to others, a provider may not purchase goods, services, or facilities from the person if an employee or a person that the provider should reasonably know is an affiliate of the provider:

Owns more than ten percent (10%) of the person; or

Is an employee or affiliate of the person.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-29.
Notice of litigation.

No later than thirty (30) days after a provider has been served with notice of a civil action for violation of this chapter by or on behalf of an individual who resides in this state at either the time of an agreement or the time the notice is served, the provider shall notify the director in a record that it has been sued.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-30.
Advertising.

A provider that advertises debt-management services shall disclose, in an easily comprehensible manner, the information specified in § 19-14.8-17(d)(3) and (d)(4).

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-31.
Liability for the conduct of other persons.

If a provider delegates any of its duties or obligations under an agreement or this chapter to another person, including an independent contractor, the provider is liable for conduct of the person that, if done by the provider, would violate the agreement or this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-32.
Powers of director or director’s designee.

The director may act on its own initiative or in response to complaints; and may receive complaints; take action to obtain voluntary compliance with this chapter; refer cases to the attorney general; and seek or provide remedies as provided in this chapter.

The director may investigate and examine, in this state or elsewhere, by subpoena or otherwise, the activities, books, accounts, and records of a person who or that provides or offers to provide debt-management services, or a person to whom or to which a provider has delegated its obligations under an agreement or this chapter, to determine compliance with this chapter. Information that identifies individuals who have agreements with the provider shall not be disclosed to the public. In connection with the investigation, the director may:

Charge the person the reasonable expenses necessarily incurred to conduct the examination;

Require or permit a person to file a statement under oath as to all the facts and circumstances of a matter to be investigated; and

Seek a court order authorizing seizure from a bank at which the person maintains a trust account required by §

19-14.8-22

, any or all money, books, records, accounts, and other property of the provider that is in the control of the bank and relates to individuals who reside in this state.

The director may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this chapter in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42.

The director may enter into cooperative arrangements with any other federal or state agency having authority over providers and may exchange with any of those agencies information about a provider, including information obtained during an examination of the provider.

[Reserved].

The director, by rule, shall adopt dollar amounts instead of those specified in §§

19-14.8-2

,

19-14.8-5

,

19-14.8-9

,

19-14.8-13

,

19-14.8-23

,

19-14.8-33

, and

19-14.8-35

to reflect inflation, as measured by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers or, if that index is not available, another index adopted by rule by the director. The director shall adopt a base year and adjust the dollar amounts, effective on July 1 of each year, if the change in the index from the base year, as of December 31 of the preceding year, is at least ten percent (10%). The dollar amount must be rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100), except that the amounts in §

19-14.8-23

must be rounded to the nearest dollar.

The director shall notify registered providers of any change in dollar amounts made pursuant to subsection (f) and make that information available to the public.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-33.
Administrative remedies.

The director may enforce this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter by taking one or more of the following actions:

Ordering a provider or a director, employee, or other agent of a provider to cease and desist from any violations;

Ordering a provider or a person who or that has caused a violation to correct the violation, including making restitution of money or property to a person aggrieved by a violation;

Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to §

19-14.8-32(f)

, imposing on a provider or a person who or that has caused a violation a civil penalty not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation;

Prosecuting a civil action to:

Enforce an order; or

Obtain restitution or an injunction or other equitable relief, or both;

Intervening in an action brought under §

19-14.8-35

.

Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to §

19-14.8-32(f)

, if a person violates or knowingly authorizes, directs, or aids in the violation of a final order issued under subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2), the director may impose a civil penalty not exceeding twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each violation.

The director may maintain an action to enforce this chapter in any county.

The director may recover the reasonable costs of enforcing the chapter under subsections (a) — (c), including attorney’s fees based on the hours reasonably expended and the hourly rates for attorneys of comparable experience in the community.

In determining the amount of a civil penalty to impose under subsection (a) or (b), the director shall consider the seriousness of the violation; the good faith of the violator; any previous violations by the violator; the deleterious effect of the violation on the public; the net worth of the violator; and any other factor the director considers relevant to the determination of the civil penalty.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-34.
Suspension, revocation or nonrenewal of registration.

In this section, “insolvent” means:

Having generally ceased to pay debts in the ordinary course of business other than as a result of good-faith dispute;

Being unable to pay debts as they become due; or

Being insolvent within the meaning of the federal bankruptcy law, 11 U.S.C. § 101 et seq., as amended.

The director may suspend, revoke, or deny renewal of a provider’s registration if:

A fact or condition exists that, if it had existed when the registrant applied for registration as a provider, would have been a reason for denying registration;

The provider has committed a material violation of this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter;

The provider is insolvent;

The provider or an employee or affiliate of the provider has refused to permit the director to make an examination authorized by this chapter, failed to comply with §

19-14.8-32(b)(2)

within fifteen (15) days after request, or made a material misrepresentation or omission in complying with §

19-14.8-32(b)(2)

; or

The provider has not responded within a reasonable time and in an appropriate manner to communications from the director.

If a provider does not comply with §

19-14.8-22(f)

or if the director otherwise finds that the public health or safety or general welfare requires emergency action, the director may order a summary suspension of the provider’s registration, effective on the date specified in the order.

If the director suspends, revokes, or denies renewal of the registration of a provider, the director may seek a court order authorizing seizure of any or all of the money in a trust account required by §

19-14.8-22

, books, records, accounts, and other property of the provider that are located in this state.

If the director suspends or revokes a provider’s registration, the provider may appeal and request a hearing pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-35.
Private enforcement.

If an individual voids an agreement pursuant to §

19-14.8-25(b)

, the individual may recover in a civil action all money paid or deposited by, or on behalf of, the individual pursuant to the agreement, except amounts paid to creditors, in addition to the recovery under subsections (c)(3) and (c)(4).

If an individual voids an agreement pursuant to §

19-14.8-25(a)

, the individual may recover in a civil action three (3) times the total amount of the fees, charges, money, and payments made by the individual to the provider, in addition to the recovery under subsection (c)(4).

Subject to subsection (d), an individual with respect to whom a provider violates this chapter may recover in a civil action from the provider and any person that caused the violation:

Compensatory damages for injury, including noneconomic injury, caused by the violation;

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section and subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to §

19-14.8-32(f)

, with respect to a violation of §

19-14.8-17

, §

19-14.8-19

, §

19-14.8-20

, §

19-14.8-21

, §

19-14.8-22

, §

19-14.8-23

, §

19-14.8-24

, §

19-14.8-27

, or §

19-14.8-28(a)

, (b), or (d), the greater of the amount recoverable under subsection (c)(1) or five thousand dollars ($5,000);

Punitive damages; and

Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

In a class action, except for a violation of §

19-14.8-28(a)(5)

, the minimum damages provided in subsection (c)(2) do not apply.

In addition to the remedy available under subsection (c), if a provider violates an individual’s rights under §

19-14.8-20

, the individual may recover in a civil action all money paid or deposited by or on behalf of the individual pursuant to the agreement, except for amounts paid to creditors.

A provider is not liable under this section for a violation of this chapter if the provider proves that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a good-faith error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid the error. An error of legal judgment with respect to a provider’s obligations under this chapter is not a good-faith error. If, in connection with a violation, the provider has received more money than authorized by an agreement or this chapter, the defense provided by this subsection is not available unless the provider refunds the excess within two (2) business days of learning of the violation.

The director shall assist an individual in enforcing a judgment against the surety bond or other security provided under §

19-14.8-13

or §

19-14.8-14

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-36.
Violation of unfair or deceptive practices statute.

If an act or practice of a provider violates both this chapter and either chapter 13.1 of title 6, an individual may not recover under both for the same act or practice.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-37.
Statute of limitations.

An action or proceeding brought pursuant to §

19-14.8-33(a)

, (b), or (c) must be commenced within four (4) years after the conduct that is the basis of the director’s complaint.

An action brought pursuant to §

19-14.8-35

must be commenced within two (2) years after the latest of:

The individual’s last transmission of money to a provider;

The individual’s last transmission of money to a creditor at the direction of the provider;

The provider’s last disbursement to a creditor of the individual;

The provider’s last accounting to the individual pursuant to §

19-14.8-27(a)

;

The date on which the individual discovered or reasonably should have discovered the facts giving rise to the individual’s claim; or

Termination of actions or proceedings by the director with respect to a violation of the chapter.

The period prescribed in subsection (b)(5) is tolled during any period during which the provider or, if different, the defendant has materially and willfully misrepresented information required by this chapter to be disclosed to the individual, if the information so misrepresented is material to the establishment of the liability of the defendant under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-38.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-39.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.) but does not modify, limit, or supersede § 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b)).

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-40.
Transitional provisions — Application to existing transactions.

Transactions entered into before this chapter takes effect and the rights, duties, and interests resulting from them may be completed, terminated, or enforced as required or permitted by a law amended, repealed, or modified by this chapter as though the amendment, repeal, or modification had not occurred.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-41.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-42.
[Reserved.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-43.
Official comments.

It is the intention of the general assembly that the official comments to this chapter represent the express legislative intent of the general assembly and shall be used as a guide for interpretation of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.